Louisiana, session 2026, HB784.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:541(24)(a), (25)(b) through (o), 542(C)(1)(introductory
paragraph) and (2), 542.1(A)(introductory paragraph) and (2)(a) and (c) and (d), and 543.1
are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 15:541(25)(p) and (q), 542.1(A)(2)(e), and
542.1.2(A)(5) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§541. Definitions
For the purposes of this Chapter, the definitions of terms in this Section shall
apply:
* * *
Page 1 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 784 ENROLLED
(24)(a) "Sex offense" means deferred adjudication, adjudication withheld,
or conviction for the perpetration or attempted perpetration of or conspiracy to
commit human trafficking when prosecuted under the provisions of R.S.
14:46.2(B)(2), R.S. 14:46.3 (trafficking of children for sexual purposes), R.S.
14:73.13(A) or (B)(2) (unlawful deepfakes), R.S. 14:89 (crime against nature), R.S.
14:89.1 (aggravated crime against nature), R.S. 14:89.2(B)(3) (crime against nature
by solicitation), R.S. 14:80 (felony carnal knowledge of a juvenile), R.S. 14:81
(indecent behavior with juveniles), R.S. 14:81.1 (pornography involving juveniles)
which occurred prior to August 1, 2025, R.S. 14:81.2 (molestation of a juvenile or
a person with a physical or mental disability), R.S. 14:81.3 (computer-aided
solicitation of a minor), R.S. 14:81.4 (prohibited sexual conduct between an educator
and student), R.S. 14:82.1 (prostitution; persons under eighteen), R.S. 14:82.2(C)(4)
or (5) (purchase of commercial sexual activity), R.S. 14:83(B)(2) or (3) (soliciting
for prostitutes), R.S. 14:92(A)(7) (contributing to the delinquency of juveniles), R.S.
14:93.5 (sexual battery of persons with infirmities), R.S. 14:106(A)(5) (obscenity by
solicitation of a person under the age of seventeen), R.S. 14:283 (video voyeurism),
R.S. 14:41 (rape), R.S. 14:42 (aggravated or first degree rape), R.S. 14:42.1 (forcible
or second degree rape), R.S. 14:43 (simple or third degree rape), R.S. 14:43.1 (sexual
battery), R.S. 14:43.2 (second degree sexual battery), R.S. 14:43.3 (oral sexual
battery), R.S. 14:43.5 (intentional exposure to HIV), a second or subsequent
conviction of R.S. 14:283.1 (voyeurism), or a second or subsequent conviction of
R.S. 14:89.3 (sexual abuse of an animal), committed on or after June 18, 1992, or
committed prior to June 18, 1992, if the person, as a result of the offense, is under
the custody of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections on or after June 18,
1992. A conviction for any offense provided in this definition includes a conviction
for the offense under the laws of another state, or military, territorial, foreign, tribal,
or federal law which is equivalent to an offense provided for in this Chapter, unless
the tribal court or foreign conviction was not obtained with sufficient safeguards for
fundamental fairness and due process for the accused as provided by the federal
Page 2 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 784 ENROLLED
guidelines adopted pursuant to the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of
2006.
* * *
(25) "Sexual offense against a victim who is a minor" means a conviction for
the perpetration or attempted perpetration of, or conspiracy to commit, any of the
following:
* * *
(b) Oral sexual battery when the victim is under the age of eighteen (R.S.
14:43.3).
(c) Aggravated crime against nature as defined by R.S. 14:89.1(A)(2) under
the circumstances not listed as those which constitute an "aggravated offense" as
defined in this Section. Unlawful deepfakes depicting a minor in violation of R.S.
14:73.13(A) or (B)(2).
(d) Indecent behavior with a juvenile when prosecuted under the provisions
of R.S. 14:81(H)(2) and the victim is under the age of thirteen.
(d) (e)(i) Pornography involving juveniles (R.S. 14:81.1), which occurred
prior to August 1, 2025.
(ii) Child sexual abuse materials (R.S. 14:81.1), which occurred on or after
August 1, 2025.
(e) (f) Molestation of a juvenile or a person with a physical or mental
disability (R.S. 14:81.2), except when prosecuted under the provisions of R.S.
14:81.2(C)(1), (D)(1), or (D)(2).
(f) (g) Computer-aided solicitation of a minor (R.S. 14:81.3).
(g) (h) Prostitution; persons under eighteen (R.S. 14:82.1).
(h) Enticing minors into prostitution (R.S. 14:86).
(i) Pandering in violation of R.S. 14:84(1), (3), (5), and (6).
(j) Soliciting for prostitutes when the persons being solicited for prostitution
are under the age of eighteen years (R.S. 14:83).
(k) Inciting prostitution when the prostitution involves persons under the age
of eighteen years (R.S. 14:83.1).
Page 3 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 784 ENROLLED
(l) Promoting prostitution when the prostitution being promoted involves
persons under the age of eighteen years (R.S. 14:83.2).
(m) Operation of places of prostitution when the prostitution involves
persons under the age of eighteen years (R.S. 14:282).
(n) Crime against nature prosecuted under the provisions of R.S. 14:89 other
than R.S. 14:89(B)(2) or (3) and the victim of the offense has not attained the age of
eighteen.
(i) Soliciting for prostitutes when the persons being solicited for prostitution
are under the age of eighteen years (R.S. 14:83).
(j) Inciting prostitution when the prostitution involves persons under the age
of eighteen years (R.S. 14:83.1).
(k) Promoting prostitution when the prostitution being promoted involves
persons under the age of eighteen years (R.S. 14:83.2).
(l) Pandering in violation of R.S. 14:84(1), (3), (5), or (6).
(m) Enticing minors into prostitution (R.S. 14:86).
(n) Crime against nature prosecuted under the provisions of R.S. 14:89 other
than R.S. 14:89(B)(2) or (3) and the victim of the offense has not attained the age of
eighteen.
(o) Aggravated crime against nature as defined by R.S. 14:89.1(A)(2) under
the circumstances not listed as those which constitute an "aggravated offense" as
defined in this Section.
(p) Operation of places of prostitution when the prostitution involves persons
under the age of eighteen years (R.S. 14:282).
(o) (q) Any conviction for an offense under the laws of another state, or
military, territorial, foreign, tribal, or federal law which is equivalent to the offenses
listed in Subparagraphs (a) through (n) (p) of this Paragraph.
* * *
§542. Registration of sex offenders and child predators
* * *
Page 4 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 784 ENROLLED
C.(1) The offender shall register and provide all of the following information
to the appropriate law enforcement agencies listed in Subsection B of this Section
in accordance with the time periods provided for in this Subsection:
* * *
(2) Unless an earlier time period is specified in the provisions of Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection, every offender required to register in accordance with this
Section shall appear in person and provide the information required by Paragraph (1)
of this Subsection to the appropriate law enforcement agencies within three business
days of establishing residence in Louisiana. If the offender is a current resident of
Louisiana and is not immediately taken into custody or incarcerated after conviction
or adjudication, he shall provide the information on the date of conviction to the
sheriffs of the parish where the offender was convicted or adjudicated for the offense
that requires registration pursuant to this Chapter and shall, within three business
days after conviction or adjudication, provide the information to the sheriff of the
parishes of the offender's residence, employment, and school. If incarcerated
immediately after conviction or placed in a secure facility immediately after
adjudication for the offense that requires registration pursuant to this Chapter, the
information required by Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall be provided to the
secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, or his designee, or the
deputy secretary for youth services, or his designee, whichever has custody of the
offender, within ten days prior to release from confinement. Once released from the
initial period of confinement for the offense that requires registration pursuant to this
Chapter, every offender shall appear in person within three business days to register
with the appropriate law enforcement agencies pursuant to the provision of this
Section. The offender shall register with the sheriff of the parish in which where the
residence address he initially supplied to the Department of Public Safety and
Corrections is located, unless his residence address has changed and he has
registered with the sheriff of the parish in which where his new residence address is
located.
* * *
Page 5 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 784 ENROLLED
§542.1. Notification of sex offenders and child predators
A. Any adult residing in this state who has pled guilty to, has been convicted
of, or where adjudication has been deferred or withheld for the perpetration or
attempted perpetration of, or conspiracy to commit, a sex offense as defined in R.S.
15:541 or a criminal offense against a minor as defined in R.S. 15:541 shall be
required to provide the following notifications:
* * *
(2)(a) Give notice of the crime for which he was convicted, his name,
jurisdiction of conviction, a description of his physical characteristics as required by
this Section, and his physical address by mail to all people residing within the
designated area within twenty-one days of the date of conviction, if the offender is
not taken into custody at the time of conviction, or within twenty-one days of the
date of release from the initial period of confinement for the offense that requires
registration pursuant to this Chapter or within twenty-one days of establishing
residency in the locale where the offender plans to have his domicile, and the notice
shall be published on two separate days within the applicable period provided for
herein, without cost to the state, in the official journal of the governing authority of
the parish where the defendant plans to reside and, if ordered by the sheriff or police
department or required by local ordinance, in a newspaper which meets the
requirements of R.S. 43:140(3) for qualification as an official journal and which has
a larger or smaller circulation in the parish than the official journal. The notice
provided to the official journal or other designated newspaper pursuant to this
Subparagraph shall also include a recent photograph of the offender or a clear
photocopy of a recent photograph of the offender.
* * *
(c) After initial notifications are completed, if the offender is subsequently
arrested for any reason or involuntarily committed to confinement in a mental health
facility, and is held for more than thirty days but returns to the same residence
address that was registered prior to arrest or confinement, it shall not be necessary
Page 6 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 784 ENROLLED
to renew community notifications unless five years have elapsed since his last
notifications were sent as required by Subparagraph (b) of this Paragraph.
(c) (d) The sheriff or police department may order that the notice be
published in a newspaper which meets the requirements of R.S. 43:140(3) for
qualification as an official journal and which has a larger circulation in the parish
than the official journal.
(d) (e) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraphs (a) and (b) of this
Paragraph, persons convicted of R.S. 14:92(A)(7) shall not be required to publish
notice of the crime for which they were convicted in the official journal or any
newspaper required by those Subparagraphs.
* * *
§542.1.2. Duty of offenders to notify law enforcement of change of address,
residence, or other registration information
A. Unless an earlier time period is otherwise specified in the provisions of
this Chapter, those persons required to register pursuant to the provisions of this
Chapter shall appear in person at the sheriff's office in the parish of residence, or the
police department in the case of a municipality with a population in excess of three
hundred thousand, where the offender is currently registered to update information
registration within three business days of establishing a new or additional physical
residential address or of changes in information previously provided when any of the
following occur:
* * *
(5) The offender, after initial registration, is subsequently arrested for any
reason or involuntarily committed to confinement in a mental health facility and is
held for more than thirty days in the prison or mental health facility.
(i) If the offender is returning to the same residence address that was
registered prior to arrest or confinement, it shall not be necessary to renew
community notifications unless five years have elapsed since his last notifications
were sent as required by R.S. 15:542.1.
Page 7 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 784 ENROLLED
(ii) The offender shall provide, in writing, his intended residence address to
the institution where he is incarcerated or confined within three days prior to release.
Prior to the release of the offender, the institution shall forward the intended
residence of the offender to the sheriff's office in the parish where the institution is
located for inclusion in the Sex Offender and Child Predator Registry.
* * *
§543.1. Written notification by the courts; form to be used
STATE V. ______________ ______ JUDICIAL DISTRICT COURT
DOCKET # __________ PARISH OF ___________________
DIVISION ______ STATE OF LOUISIANA
Notification to Sex Offender
In accordance with R.S. 15:543, this court has the duty to provide
_______________________ (name of offender) with the information necessary for
awareness of sex offender and child predator registration and notification
requirements as well as any applicable requirements of supervised release pursuant
to Chapter 3-E of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
_______________________ has pled guilty to, been found guilty of, or been
adjudicated delinquent of a violation of Title 14, Section ____ Subsection ____ of
the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950. This crime of conviction or adjudication is:
( ) Under R.S. 15:541, defined as an aggravated offense or, with regard to
offenders adjudicated as juveniles, an offense listed in R.S. 15:542(A)(3) which,
pursuant to R.S. 15:544(B)(2)(a) or (b), requires lifetime registration and notification
under Chapter 3-B of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
( ) A second conviction for an offense requiring registration and notification
under the provisions of Chapter 3-B of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950 which, pursuant to R.S. 15:544(B)(2)(c), requires lifetime registration and
notification under Chapter 3-B of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
( ) Under R.S. 15:541, defined as a sexual offense against a victim who is
a minor which, pursuant to R.S. 15:544(B)(1), requires 25 years of registration and
notification under Chapter 3-B of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
Page 8 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 784 ENROLLED
( ) Is defined neither as an aggravated offense nor a sexual offense against
a victim who is a minor under R.S. 15:541 which, pursuant to R.S. 15:544(A),
requires 15 years of registration and notification under Chapter 3-B of Title 15 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
The above registration and notification periods shall begin to toll from the
date you are released from prison, from the date of being placed on parole,
supervised release or probation, or from the date of your conviction, if you are not
sentenced to a term of imprisonment or jail. Additionally, you have been convicted
of:
( ) An aggravated offense as defined in R.S. 15:541 or more than one
conviction of an offense that requires registration pursuant to R.S. 15:542 and
544(B)(2)(c), you must update your registration, in person, every ninety days from
the date of initial registration, with the appropriate law enforcement agencies as
provided in R.S. 15:542.
( ) A sexual offense involving a victim who is a minor as defined in R.S.
15:541, you must update your registration, in person, every six months from the date
of initial registration, with the appropriate law enforcement agencies as provided in
R.S. 15:542.
( ) An offense not defined in R.S. 15:541 as an aggravated offense or a
sexual offense involving a victim who is a minor, you must update your registration,
in person, annually from the date of initial registration, with the appropriate law
enforcement agencies as provided in R.S. 15:542.
Additionally, if the offense that requires registration as a sex offender
involves a victim under the age of thirteen and you are incarcerated as a result of the
conviction for that offense, you are advised that you will be subjected to supervised
release under Chapter 3-E of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 once
you are released from incarceration. A copy of these statutes are provided to you
with this notification.
Page 9 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 784 ENROLLED
Based on the foregoing, you are hereby notified of the following:
(1) That you, within three (3) business days of establishing residence in
Louisiana or if a current resident, within three (3) business days after conviction or
adjudication if not immediately incarcerated or taken into custody, or within three
(3) business days after release from confinement, shall obtain and provide the
following information to each sheriff or police department in accordance with R.S.
15:542(B) (except in Orleans Parish where registration shall take place with the New
Orleans Police Department):
(a) Name and any aliases used by you.
(b) Physical address or addresses of residence.
(c) Name and physical address of place of employment. If you do not have
a fixed place of employment, you shall provide information with as much specificity
as possible regarding the places where you work, including but not limited to travel
routes used by you.
(d) Name and physical address of the school in which where you are a
student.
(e) Two forms of proof of residence for each residential address provided,
including but not limited to a driver's license, bill for utility service, and bill for
telephone service. If those forms of proof of residence are not available, you may
provide an affidavit of an adult resident living at the same address. The affidavit
shall certify that the affiant understands his obligation to provide written notice
pursuant to R.S. 15:542.1.4 to the appropriate law enforcement agency with whom
you last registered when you no longer reside at the residence provided in the
affidavit.
(f) The crime for which you were convicted and the date and place of such
conviction, and if known by you, the court in which where the conviction was
obtained, the docket number of the case, the specific statute under which you were
convicted, and the sentence imposed.
(g) A current photograph, fingerprints, palm prints, and a DNA sample.
Page 10 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 784 ENROLLED
(h) Telephone numbers, including fixed location phone and mobile phone
numbers assigned to you or associated with your residence address.
(i) A description of every motorized vehicle registered to or operated by you,
including license plate number and vehicle identification number, and a copy of your
driver's license and identification card. This information should always be provided
before the vehicle is operated and, if the vehicle is registered to you, no more than
three days after the vehicle is registered, even if it has not yet been operated.
(j) Social security number and date of birth.
(k) A description of your physical characteristics, including but not limited
to sex, race, hair color, eye color, height, age, weight, scars, tattoos, or other
identifying marks on your body.
(l) Every e-mail address, online screen name, or other online identity,
including any static IP addresses, used by you to communicate on the Internet.
(m)(i) Temporary lodging information regarding any place where you plan
to stay for seven or more days and the length of the stay. This information shall be
provided at least three days prior to the date of departure unless an emergency
situation has prevented the timely disclosure of the information.
(ii) Temporary lodging information regarding international travel shall be
provided regardless of the number of days or nights you plan to stay. This
information shall be provided at least twenty-one days prior to the date of departure
unless an emergency situation has prevented the timely disclosure of the information.
Upon receipt of this information by the bureau from the law enforcement agency,
this information shall then be sent by the bureau to the United States Marshals
Service's National Sex Offender Targeting Center for transmission to the proper
authorities.
(n) Travel and immigration documents, including but not limited to passports
and documents establishing immigration status.
(o) A state sex offender identification card from the office of motor vehicles.
(2) You shall register with the sheriff and police chief in each parish and
municipality where you maintain your residence(s) and with the sheriff of the parish
Page 11 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 784 ENROLLED
in which where you are employed and attend school in accordance with R.S. 15:542.
For initial registration only, you, if you are not immediately taken into physical
custody, shall register on the date of conviction or adjudication with the sheriff in the
parish of your conviction or adjudication in accordance with R.S. 15:542. If you
live, work, or attend school in Orleans Parish, however, you shall register with the
New Orleans Police Department and not with the sheriff of that parish.
(3) If you are incarcerated as a result of the crime, you shall provide all
information listed in Paragraph (1) of this Section to the Department of Public Safety
and Corrections, or if a juvenile, to the office of juvenile justice, within ten (10) days
prior to release from confinement. You shall still appear in person at the sheriff's
office within three (3) business days of release from confinement. You shall register
with the sheriff of the parish in which where the residence address you initially
supplied to the department is located, unless the residence has changed and you have
registered with the sheriff of the parish in which where the new residence address is
located.
(4) During the declaration of an emergency, if you enter an emergency
shelter you shall, within the first twenty-four (24) hours of admittance, notify the
management of the facility, the chief of police of the municipality, and the sheriff of
the parish in which where the shelter is located of your sex offender status in
accordance with R.S. 15:543.2 and R.S. 29:726(E)(14)(c) through (e).
(5) You have a duty to provide notice of change of address or other
registration information to the sheriff of the parish of residence within three business
days. If the new or additional residence is located in a different parish, then you
must register with the sheriff of the parish in which where the new or additional
residence is located. You shall also send written notice within three business days
of re-registering in the new parish to the sheriff of the parish of former registration
in accordance with R.S. 15:542.1.2. If the new address is situated within a
municipality, you must also register with the police department of that municipality
within three business days of establishing the residence.
Page 12 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 784 ENROLLED
(6) You shall give notice of the crime for which you were convicted, your
name, address, a physical description, and a photograph to the following in
accordance with R.S. 15:542.1:
(a) At least one person in every residence or business within a one-mile
radius in a rural area and a three-tenths of a mile radius in an urban or suburban area
of the address of the residence where you will reside upon release, including all adult
residents of your residence.
(b) The superintendent of the school district where you will reside.
(c) The lessor, landlord, or owner of the residence or the property on which
you reside.
(d) The superintendent of the park, playground, and recreation districts
within the designated area where you will reside only if the victim was under
eighteen (18) years of age at the time of the commission of the offense.
*Any person convicted of a violation of R.S. 14:89 shall not have to include
a photograph in the notice described in Paragraph (6).
*Juveniles adjudicated for a crime requiring registration DO NOT have to
provide this community notice.
(7) In accordance with R.S. 15:542.1, community notification shall be given
by mail within twenty-one days of the date of conviction, if you are not taken into
custody at the time of conviction, and within twenty-one days of the date of release
from confinement if sentenced to a term of imprisonment for the conviction of the
sex offense. This notification shall also occur within twenty-one days of each time
you change residence within twenty-one days of establishing residency in the new
locale. This notification shall also occur at least every five years, whether or not you
change residences. This notification shall occur in each jurisdiction in which where
you regularly reside.
*Juveniles adjudicated for a crime requiring registration DO NOT have to
provide this community notice.
(8) In accordance with R.S. 15:542.1, community notice shall be published
on two (2) separate days within this period in the official journal of the governing
Page 13 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 784 ENROLLED
authority of the parish where you plan to reside, unless ordered to be published in a
different journal or newspaper by the sheriff or local ordinance.
*Those convicted of R.S. 14:92(A)(7) are not required to publish notice in
the newspaper or official journal as provided in Paragraph (8).
*Juveniles who are adjudicated for a crime requiring registration DO NOT
have to provide this community notice.
(9) In accordance with R.S. 15:542.1(B), an offender who provides
recreational instruction to persons under the age of seventeen (17) shall post a notice
in the building or facility where such instruction is being given. This notice shall
contain your name and photograph, the date and jurisdiction of conviction, and the
crime for which you were convicted.
(10) In accordance with R.S. 15:542(C)(2), you must, within ten (10) days
prior to release from a correctional facility, provide a photograph and all other
required registration information to the Department of Public Safety and Corrections,
or if a juvenile, to the office of juvenile justice for purposes of the State Sex
Offender and Child Predator Registry. Providing false information during this
process constitutes failure to register exposing you to prosecution and the penalties
detailed at the end of this document. The address provided to the Department of
Public Safety and Corrections through this process shall be presumed to be your
residence address. In accordance with R.S. 15:542(C)(2), you must register with the
sheriff of the parish in which where this address is located within three business days
of your release from confinement, whether or not you actually establish a residence
there, unless you establish a residence elsewhere AND register with that jurisdiction
within three business days of your release from confinement. Failure to do so is a
violation of the registration statutes and will subject you to prosecution under R.S.
15:542.1.4.
(11) In accordance with R.S. 15:542.1.2, if you change your place of
residence or establish a new or additional residence, you shall appear in person at the
office of the sheriff of your parish of residence where you are currently registered
within three (3) business days of the change to register the new address. If the new
Page 14 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 784 ENROLLED
address is located in a different parish, then you shall also appear in person at the
office of the sheriff of your new parish of residence within the same time period. If
your parish of residence is in Orleans Parish, then the registration shall take place at
the New Orleans Police Department and not with the Orleans Parish Sheriff.
(12) In accordance with R.S. 15:542.1.2, if you are absent from your current
address of registration for more than thirty (30) consecutive days or an aggregate of
thirty (30) days or more in a calendar year, and are physically present at another
address during that same period of time, you shall register in person the new address
as one of your addresses of residence. If the new address is in a parish different from
your current address, you shall also register in person with the sheriff of the new
parish within three (3) business days of the tolling of the time periods listed. This
requirement notwithstanding, you shall still notify the sheriff of one of your parishes
of residence in person if you are to take up temporary lodging for seven (7) or more
days. It is only after the thirty-day limit is exceeded that the new registration shall
occur.
(13) You shall also appear in person at the office of the sheriff of any of your
parishes of residence when there is a change in your name, place of employment, or
enrollment. This appearance shall occur within three (3) business days of the
change. If your address of residence is in Orleans Parish, this registration update
shall take place at the New Orleans Police Department and not with the Orleans
Parish Sheriff's Office.
(14) After your initial registration, if you are subsequently arrested for any
reason or involuntarily committed to confinement in a mental health facility and you
are held for more than thirty days in prison or a mental health facility, you shall
appear in person at the office of the sheriff of your parish of residence (except in
Orleans Parish where registration shall take place with the New Orleans Police
Department) where you are currently registered within three (3) business days.
(a) If you are returning to the same residence address that was registered
prior to arrest or confinement, it shall not be necessary to renew community
Page 15 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 784 ENROLLED
notifications unless five years have elapsed since your last notifications were sent as
required by R.S. 15:542.1.
(b) You shall provide, in writing, your intended residence address to the
institution where you are incarcerated or confined within three (3) days prior to
release.
(14) (15) You shall be prohibited from certain types of employment in
accordance with R.S. 15:553 for the duration of the registration period. A copy of
this statute is provided to you with this notification.
(15) (16) In accordance with R.S. 15:542(C), you shall update your
registration annually on the anniversary of the initial registration by appearing in
person at the office of each law enforcement agency with which you are required to
register and shall pay an annual registration fee of sixty dollars ($60.00).
(16) (17) Failure to comply with any of these registration and notification
requirements is a felony for which you shall be punished by a fine of up to one
thousand dollars ($1,000.00) and imprisonment at hard labor for not less than two
years nor more than ten years without benefit of parole, probation, or suspension of
sentence. Upon a second or subsequent conviction, you shall be punished by a fine
of up to three thousand dollars ($3,000.00) and imprisonment at hard labor for not
less than five years, nor more than twenty years without benefit of parole, probation,
or suspension of sentence.
(17) (18) For those offenders who have been convicted of a sex offense as
defined in R.S. 15:541 involving a victim who was under the age of thirteen (13) at
the time of the offense, R.S. 14:91.2 is applicable which prohibits such offenders
from residing or being present in certain locations. A copy of this statute is provided
to you with this notification.
(18) (19) For those offenders who have been convicted of R.S. 14:81
(indecent behavior with juveniles), R.S. 14:81.1 (pornography involving juveniles)
which occurred prior to August 1, 2025, R.S. 14:81.1 (child sexual abuse materials)
which occurred on or after August 1, 2025, R.S. 14:81.3 (computer-aided solicitation
of a minor), or R.S. 14:283 (video voyeurism) or have been convicted of a sex
Page 16 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 784 ENROLLED
offense as defined in R.S. 15:541 in which where the victim of the sex offense was
a minor, R.S. 14:91.5, which prohibits such offenders from using certain social
networking websites, is applicable. A copy of this statute is provided to you with
this notification. If you are not otherwise prohibited and use any social networking
website, you must include in your profile for the social networking website an
indication that you are a sex offender or child predator in accordance with R.S.
15:542.1(D). You must include notice of the crime for which you were convicted,
the jurisdiction of conviction, a description of your physical characteristics, and your
residential address. This notice must be visible to all other users and visitors of the
networking website.
THUS DONE AND SIGNED this ____ day of _____________, 20___ in
open court, in_____________, Louisiana.
______________________________
Judge, ____ Judicial District Court
I hereby certify that the above requirements have been explained to me, that I have
received a copy of the above notice of sex offender registration and notification
requirements, and a copy of the statutes providing for such requirements. I also understand
that I will be subject to any changes made by the legislature to the registration laws from this
day forward.
____________________________
(Name of Sex Offender)
____________________________
Defense Counsel Signature
Section 3. R.S. 32:412(I) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§412. Amount of fees; credit or refund; duration of license; veteran designation;
special needs or accommodation designations; disbursement of funds;
renewal by mail or electronic commerce of Class "D" or "E" drivers' licenses;
disposition of certain fees; exception
* * *
Page 17 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 784 ENROLLED
I.(1) The A Louisiana driver's license, regardless of its class, issued to any
person who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to R.S. 15:542 and R.S.
15:542.1 Chapter 3-B of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 shall
contain a restriction quick response code which declares that or a QR code on the
back of the driver's license for the purposes of assisting law enforcement in
determining whether or not the license holder is a sex offender. The secretary of the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall comply with the provisions of this
Subsection and the driver's license shall include the words "sex offender" which shall
be orange in color.
(2) Any person to whom this Subsection applies shall carry upon his person
the last driver's license issued to him. A person who is issued a driver's license
pursuant to this Subsection shall carry his driver's license on his person at all times
when he is outside of his residence.
* * *
(4) Any person to whom who is subject to this Subsection applies shall
personally appear at a motor vehicle field office to renew his driver's license every
year, in addition to the yearly reregistration pursuant to R.S. 15:542 et seq.
Reregistration shall include the submission of current information to the department
and the verification of registration information, including the street address and
telephone number of the registrant; name, street address, and telephone number of
the registrant's employer, and any other registration information that may need to be
verified. Upon successful completion of reregistration, the bureau shall
electronically transmit this fact the completed reregistration to the office of motor
vehicles which may then proceed to renew the driver's license. In order to reimburse
the office of motor vehicles for the cost of a yearly issuance, the The regular renewal
fee shall be collected at each renewal pursuant to this Subsection.
(5) Whoever intentionally fails to meet the requirements of this Subsection
shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars nor more than five hundred dollars
or imprisoned for not more than six months, or both.
Page 18 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 784 ENROLLED
(5)(6) The provisions of this This Subsection shall apply applies to all
registered sex offenders regardless of the date of conviction. This Subsection does
not apply to any registered sex offender who possesses a special identification card
pursuant to R.S. 40:1321(J). A registered sex offender who has been issued a
driver's license pursuant to this Subsection shall forfeit his driver's license to the
office of motor vehicles if he subsequently obtains a special identification card
pursuant to R.S. 40:1321(J). Any registered sex offender who has both a driver's
license and a special identification card shall have a quick response code or QR code
on his driver's license and special identification card, as required by this Subsection.
* * *
Section 4. R.S. 40:1321(J) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1321. State identification cards; special identification cards; issuance; veteran
designation; special needs or accommodation designations; fees; expiration
and renewal; exceptions; promulgation of rules; promotion of use; persons
less than twenty-one years of age; the Protect and Save our Children
Program; Selective Service Registration
* * *
J.(1) Any person required to register as a sex offender with the Louisiana
Bureau of Criminal Identification and Information, as required by R.S. 15:542 et
seq., pursuant to Chapter 3-B of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950
shall obtain a special identification card issued by the Department of Public Safety
and Corrections which shall contain a restriction quick response code declaring that,
or QR Code, on the back of the special identification card for the purposes of
assisting law enforcement in determining whether or not the holder is a sex offender.
This special identification card shall include the words "sex offender" in all capital
letters which are orange in color and shall be valid for a period of one year from the
date of issuance. This special identification card shall be carried on the person The
holder shall carry the special identification card on his person at all times by the
individual required to register as a sex offender when he is outside of his residence.
Page 19 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 784 ENROLLED
(2) Each person required to carry a special identification card pursuant to this
Subsection shall personally appear, annually, at a field office of the office of motor
vehicles to renew obtain his or her special identification card but only after he or she
has registered as an a sex offender pursuant to R.S. 15:542 et seq Chapter 3-B of
Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950. Reregistration shall include
includes the submission of current information to the department and the verification
of this information, which shall include includes the street address and telephone
number of the registrant; the name, street address, and telephone number of the
registrant's employer, and any registration information that may need to be verified
by the bureau. No special identification card shall be issued or renewed until the
office of motor vehicles receives confirmation from the bureau The office of motor
vehicles shall not issue a special identification card until the bureau has confirmed
to the office, electronically or by other means, that the reregistration of the sex
offender has been completed.
(3) The provisions of this Except as provided in Paragraph (5) of this
Subsection, this Subsection shall apply applies to all sex offenders who are required
to register pursuant to R.S. 15:542 et seq. Chapter 3-B of Title 15 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950, regardless of the date of conviction.
(4) Whoever violates intentionally fails to meet the requirements of this
Subsection shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars and not nor more than
five hundred dollars, or imprisoned for not more than six months, or both.
(5) This Subsection does not apply to any registered sex offender who
possesses a driver's license pursuant to R.S. 32:412(I). A registered sex offender
who has been issued a special identification card pursuant to this Subsection shall
forfeit his special identification card to the office of motor vehicles if he
subsequently obtains a driver's license pursuant to R.S. 32:412(I). Any registered
sex offender who has both a driver's license and a special identification card shall
have a quick response code or QR code on his driver's license and special
identification card, as required by this Subsection.
* * *
Page 20 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 784 ENROLLED
Section 5. R.S. 15:542.1(A)(1)(e) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 6. This Section and Sections 3 and 4 of this Act shall become effective on
January 1, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 21 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.